Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.193.005

Intent—Findings.

The legislature intends to provide for the operation of education programs for the department of corrections' juvenile inmates. School districts, educational service districts, or any combination thereof should be the primary providers of the education programs. However, the legislature does not intend to preclude community and technical colleges, four-year institutions of higher education, or other qualified entities from contracting to provide all or part of these education programs if no school district or educational service district is willing to operate all or part of the education programs.

The legislature finds that this chapter fully satisfies any constitutional duty to provide education programs for juvenile inmates in adult correctional facilities. The legislature further finds that biennial appropriations for education programs under this chapter amply provide for any constitutional duty to educate juvenile inmates in adult correctional facilities.

[ 1998 c 244 s 1.]